Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Article V Powers of Enforcement Personnel

21-28-5.01.
Powers of enforcement personnel.

It is made the duty of all peace officers within the state, and of all prosecuting officers, to enforce all provisions of this chapter except those specifically delegated in the chapter, and to cooperate with all agencies charged with the enforcement of the laws of the United States, of this state, and of all other states relating to controlled substances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 28, § 5.

21-28-5.02.
Administrative inspections.

The director of health may make administrative inspections of controlled premises in accordance with the following provisions:

For purposes of this section only, “controlled premises” means:

Places where persons registered or exempted from registration requirements under this chapter are required to keep records; and

Places including factories, warehouses, establishments, and conveyances in which persons registered or exempted from registration requirements under this chapter are permitted to hold, manufacture, compound, process, sell, deliver, or dispose of any controlled substance.

An officer or employee designated by the director of health, upon presenting the appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, may enter controlled premises for the purpose of conducting an administrative inspection.

An officer or employee designated by the director of health may:

Inspect and copy records required by this chapter to be kept;

Inspect, within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner, controlled premises and all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished material, containers and labeling found in the premises, and, except as provided in subdivision (4) of this section, all other things in the premises, including records, files, papers, processes, controls, and facilities bearing on the enforcement of this chapter; and

Inventory any stock of any controlled substance in the premises and obtain samples of the controlled substance;

An inspection authorized by this section shall not extend to financial data, sales data, other than shipment data, or pricing data unless the owner, operator, or agent in charge of the controlled premises consents in writing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-5.03.
[Reserved.]

21-28-5.04.
Forfeiture of property and money.

Any property, real or personal, including, but not limited to, vessels, vehicles, or aircraft, and money or negotiable instruments, securities, or other things of value or any property constituting, or derived from any proceeds, furnished, or intended to be furnished, by any person for the transportation of, or in exchange for, a controlled substance and that has been, or is being used, in violation of §

21-28-4.01(a)

or

21-28-4.01(b)

or in, upon, or by means of which any violation of §§

21-28-4.01(a)

or

21-28-4.01(b)

or §§

21-28-4.01.1

or

21-28-4.01.2

or

21-28-4.08

has taken, or is taking place, and all real property including any right, title, and interest in the whole of any lot or tract of land and any appurtenances or improvements that is used in the commission of a violation of §§ 21-28-4.01(a) or 21-28-4.01(b) or §§

21-28-4.01.1

or

21-28-4.01.2

or

21-28-4.08

, or that was purchased with funds obtained as a result of the commission of a violation of §§ 21-28-4.01(a) or §§ 21-28-4.01(b) or §§ 21-28-4.01.1 or 21-28-4.01.2 or 21-28-4.08, shall be seized and forfeited; provided that no property or money, as enumerated in this subsection, used by any person shall be forfeited under the provisions of this chapter unless it shall appear that the owner of the property or money had knowledge, actual or constructive, and was a consenting party to the alleged illegal act. All moneys, coin and currency, found in close proximity to forfeitable controlled substances, to forfeitable drug manufacturing or distributing paraphernalia, or to forfeitable records of the importation, manufacture, or distribution of controlled substances, are presumed to be unlawfully furnished in exchange for a controlled substance or used in violation of this chapter. The burden of proof is upon claimants of the property to rebut this presumption.

Property taken or detained under this section shall not be repleviable, but shall be deemed to be in the custody of the law enforcement agency making the seizure and whenever property or money is forfeited under this chapter it shall be utilized as follows:

Where the seized property is a vessel, vehicle, aircraft, or other personal property it may be retained and used by the law enforcement agency that seized the property where the use of the property is reasonably related to the law enforcement duties of the seizing agency. If the seized property is a motor vehicle that is inappropriate for use by the law enforcement agency due to style, size, or color, the seizing agency shall be allowed to apply the proceeds of sale or the trade-in value of the vehicle towards the purchase of an appropriate vehicle for use in activities reasonably related to law enforcement duties.

The law enforcement agency may sell any forfeited property not required by this chapter to be destroyed and not harmful to the public. The proceeds from the sale are to be distributed in accordance with subdivision (3) of this subsection.

As to the proceeds from the sale of seized property as referred to in subdivision (2) of this subsection, and as to moneys, coin and currency, negotiable instruments, securities, or other things of value as referred to in subsection (a) of this section, the distribution shall be as follows:

All proceeds of the forfeiture of real or personal property shall be distributed as follows: All costs of advertising administrative forfeitures shall first be deducted from the amount forfeited. Of the remainder, twenty percent (20%) of the proceeds shall be provided to the attorney general’s department to be used for further drug-related law enforcement activities including, but not limited to, investigations, prosecutions, and the administration of this chapter; seventy percent (70%) of the proceeds shall be divided among the state and local law enforcement agencies proportionately based upon their contribution to the investigation of the criminal activity related to the asset being forfeited; and ten percent (10%) of the proceeds shall be provided to the department of health for distribution to substance abuse treatment programs.

The law enforcement agencies involved in the investigation, with the assistance of the attorney general, shall by agreement determine the respective proportionate share to be received by each agency. If the agencies are unable to reach agreement, application shall be made by one or more of the agencies involved to the presiding justice of the superior court who shall determine the respective proportionate share attributable to each law enforcement agency. The proceeds from all forfeitures shall be held by the general treasurer in a separate account until such time as an allocation is determined by agreement of the agencies or by the presiding justice. It shall be the duty and responsibility of the general treasurer to disburse the allocated funds from the separate account to the respective law enforcement agencies.

Each state or local law enforcement agency shall be entitled to keep the forfeited money or the proceeds from sales of forfeited property. The funds shall be used for law enforcement purposes and investigations of violations of this chapter. The funds received by a state law enforcement agency shall be maintained in a separate account by the general treasurer. The funds received by a local law enforcement agency shall be maintained in a separate account by the local agency’s city or town treasurer.

There is established in the state’s treasury a special fund to be known as the asset forfeiture fund in which shall be deposited the excess proceeds of forfeitures arising out of criminal acts occurring before July 1, 1987. The asset forfeiture fund shall be used to fund drug-related law enforcement activity and the treatment and rehabilitation of victims of drug abuse. The fund shall be administered through the office of the general treasurer. The presiding justice of the superior court shall have the authority to determine the feasibility and amount of disbursement to those state or local law enforcement agencies that have made application.

Upon the application of any law enforcement agency of the state of Rhode Island, when a special need exists concerning the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, the attorney general, or his or her designee, may apply to the presiding justice of the superior court for the release from the general treasury of sums of money. When the presiding justice upon consideration of the reasons set forth by that agency deems them to be reasonable and necessary to the accomplishment of a goal within the powers and duties of that law enforcement agency, he or she may issue an order ex parte providing for the release of the funds.

Each law enforcement agency making any seizure(s) that result(s) in a forfeiture pursuant to this section shall certify and file with the state treasurer between January 1 and January 30 an annual report detailing the property or money forfeited during the previous calendar year and the use or disposition of the property or money. The report shall be made in the form and manner as may be provided or specified by the treasurer and these annual law enforcement agency reports shall be provided to the local governmental body governing the agency and to the house and senate judiciary committees.

Any law enforcement agency whose duty it is to enforce the laws of this state relating to controlled substances is empowered to authorize designated officers or agents to carry out the seizure provisions of this chapter. It shall be the duty of any officer or agent authorized or designated, or authorized by law, whenever he or she shall discover any property or monies that have been, or are being, used in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, or in, upon, or by means of which any violation of this chapter has taken or is taking place, to seize the property or monies and to place it in the custody of the person as may be authorized or designated for that purpose by the respective law enforcement agency pursuant to those provisions.

For purposes of this section and §

30-14-2

only, the Rhode Island national guard shall be deemed a law enforcement agency eligible to participate in the forfeiture of money and assets seized through counterdrug operations in which members of the guard support federal, state or municipal efforts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 269, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 666, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 31, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 4; P.L. 1998, ch. 391, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 54; P.L. 2011, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 70, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 75, § 2.

21-28-5.04.1.
Criminal forfeiture procedures.

Any criminal complaint, information, or indictment charging one or more covered offenses shall set forth with reasonable particularity property that the attorney general seeks to forfeit pursuant to this section.

The court may, upon application of the attorney general, enter a restraining order or injunction, require any person claiming any interest in the subject property to execute a satisfactory performance bond to the state, or take any other action to preserve the availability of property subject to forfeiture described in §

21-28-5.04

, whether prior or subsequent to the filing of a complaint, indictment, or information. Written notice and an opportunity for a hearing shall be afforded to persons appearing to have an interest in the property, the hearing to be limited to the issues of whether:

There is a substantial probability that the state will prevail on the issue of forfeiture and that failure to enter the order will result in the property being destroyed, conveyed, encumbered or further encumbered, removed from the jurisdiction of the court, or made unavailable for forfeitures; and

The need to preserve the availability of property through the entry of the requested order outweighs the hardship on any party against whom the order is to be entered.

A temporary restraining order under this section may be entered upon application of the attorney general without notice or opportunity for a hearing when a complaint, information, or indictment has not yet been filed with respect to the property if the attorney general demonstrates that there is probable cause to believe that the property with respect to which the order is sought would, in the event of conviction, be subject to forfeiture under §

21-28-5.04

and that provision of notice will jeopardize the availability of the property for forfeiture. The temporary restraining order shall expire within ten (10) days of the date on which it is entered unless extended for good cause shown or unless the party against whom it is entered consents to an extension for a longer period.

A hearing requested by any party in interest concerning an order entered under this subsection shall be held at the earliest possible time and prior to the expiration of the temporary order.

The court may receive and consider, at the hearing held pursuant to this subsection, evidence and information that would be inadmissible in court.

Upon conviction of a person for a covered offense the court shall enter a judgment of forfeiture of the property described in §

21-28-5.04

to the state and shall also authorize the attorney general to seize all property ordered forfeited upon any terms and conditions that the court shall deem proper. Following the entry of an order declaring the property forfeited, the court may, upon application of the attorney general, enter any appropriate restraining orders or injunctions, require the execution of satisfactory performance bonds, appoint receivers, conservators, appraisers, accountants, or trustees, or take any other action to protect the interest of the state in the property ordered forfeited. Any income accruing to or derived from an enterprise or an interest in an enterprise that has been ordered forfeited under this section may be used to offset ordinary and necessary expenses of the enterprise as required by law or that are necessary to protect the interest of the state or innocent third parties.

All right, title, and interest in property described in §

21-28-5.04

vests in the state upon the commission of the act giving rise to forfeiture under this chapter. Any property that is subsequently transferred to any person may be the subject of a special verdict of forfeiture and after this shall be ordered forfeited to the state, unless the transferee establishes in a hearing pursuant to subsection (f) of this section that he or she is a bona fide purchaser for value of the property who at the time of purchase was reasonably without cause to believe that the property was subject for forfeiture.

Procedures subsequent to the special verdict of forfeiture shall be as follows:

Following the entry of an order of forfeiture under this section, the state shall publish notice of the order and of its intent to dispose of the property once per week for at least three (3) weeks in the manner that the attorney general may provide by regulation. The attorney general shall also, to the extent practicable, provide written notice to all parties known to have an interest in the property and all parties whose identity is reasonably subject to discovery and who may have an interest in the forfeited property.

Any person, other than the defendant, asserting any interest in property that has been ordered forfeited to the state pursuant to this section may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the final publication of notice or his or her receipt of notice under subdivision (1) of this subsection, whichever is earlier, petition the court for a hearing to adjudicate the validity of his or her alleged interest in the property.

The petition shall be signed by the petitioner under penalty of perjury and shall set forth the nature and extent of the petitioner’s right, title, or interest in the property; and additional facts supporting the petitioner’s claim; and the relief sought.

The hearing on the petition shall, to the extent practicable and consistent with the interest of justice, be held within thirty (30) days of the filing of the petition. The court may consolidate the hearing on the petition with a hearing on any other petition filed by a person other than the defendant and concerning the same property.

At a hearing, the petitioner may testify and present evidence and witnesses on his own behalf, and cross-examine witnesses who appear at the hearing. The state may present evidence and witnesses in rebuttal and in defense of its claim to the property and cross-examine witnesses who appear at the hearing. In addition to testimony and evidence presented at the hearing, the court shall consider the relevant portions of the record of the criminal case that resulted in the order of forfeiture.

In accordance with its findings at the hearing, the court shall amend the order of forfeiture if it determines that the petitioner has established by a preponderance of the evidence that:

The petitioner has a right, title, or interest in the property, and the right, title or interest was vested in the petitioner rather than the defendant or was superior to any right, title, or interest of the defendant at the time of the commission of the acts which gave rise to the forfeiture of the property under this section; or

The petitioner is a bona fide purchaser for value of any right, title, or interest in the property and was at the time of purchase reasonably without cause to believe that the property was subject to forfeiture under this section.

Following the court’s disposition of all petitions filed under this section, or if no such petitions are filed, following the expiration of the period provided in §

21-28-5.04

for the filing of the petitions, the state shall have clear title to property that is the subject of the order of forfeiture and shall transfer good and sufficient title to any subsequent purchaser, transferee, or fund as provided in this chapter.

Except as provided in this section, no party claiming an interest in property subject to forfeiture under this section may:

Intervene in a trial or appeal of a criminal case involving the forfeiture of the property; or

Commence any action against the state concerning the validity of the alleged interest.

In order to facilitate the identification or location of property declared forfeited and to facilitate the disposition of petitions filed pursuant to §

21-28-5.04

after the entry of an order declaring forfeited property to the state, the court may, upon application of the attorney general, order that the testimony of any witness relating to the property forfeited be taken by deposition and that any designated book, paper, document, record, recording (electronic or otherwise), or other material not privileged, be produced at the same time and place, in the same manner as provided for the taking of depositions under the Rules of Civil Procedure.

If any of the property described in §

21-28-5.04

: (1) cannot be located; (2) has been transferred to, sold to or deposited with a third party; (3) has been placed beyond the jurisdiction of the court; (4) has been substantially diminished in value by any act or omission of the defendant; or (5) has been commingled with other property which cannot be divided without difficulty; the court shall order the forfeiture of any other property of the defendant up to the value of the subject property.

The court shall have jurisdiction to enter orders as provided in this section without regard to the location of any property that may be subject to forfeiture under this section or that has been ordered forfeited under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 371, § 2.

21-28-5.04.2.
Civil forfeiture procedure.

In addition to or in lieu of the criminal forfeiture procedures of this chapter, any property described in §

21-28-5.04

except as designated in subsection (b) of this section, is subject to civil forfeiture to the state. Civil forfeiture proceedings shall be in the nature of an action in rem and shall be governed by the civil rules for in rem proceedings.

All property described in §

21-28-5.04

is subject to civil forfeiture except that:

No conveyances used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier shall be forfeited under the provisions of this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance was a consenting party or privy to the covered offense charged;

No conveyance shall be forfeited under the provisions of this section by reason of any act or omission established by the owner of it to have been committed or omitted by any person other than the owner while the conveyance was unlawfully in the possession of a person other than the owner in violation of the criminal laws of this state or of the United States; and

No property shall be forfeited under this section, to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission established by that owner to have been committed or omitted without knowledge or consent of that owner.

Property subject to forfeiture under this section may be seized by a law enforcement officer:

Upon process issued pursuant to the Rules of Civil Procedure applicable to in rem proceedings;

Upon process issued pursuant to a legally authorized search warrant; or

Without court process when:

The seizure is incident to a lawful arrest or search;

The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a controlled substance act;

The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety; or

The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property is forfeitable under §

21-28-5.04

.

In the event of a seizure under §

21-28-5.04

the property shall not be subject to sequestration or attachment but is deemed to be in the custody of the law enforcement agency making the seizure, subject only to the order of the court. When property is seized under this section, pending forfeiture and final disposition, the law enforcement agency making the seizure may:

Place the property under seal;

Remove the property to a storage area for safekeeping;

Remove the property to a place designated by the court; or

Request another agency authorized by law to take custody of the property and remove it to an appropriate location within the jurisdiction of the court.

As soon as practicable after seizure, the seizing agency shall conduct an inventory upon and cause the appraisal of the property seized.

In the event of a seizure under this section, the seizing agency shall within thirty (30) days send to the attorney general a written request for forfeiture, which shall include a statement of all facts and circumstances including the names of all witnesses then known, the appraised value of the property and the statutory provision relied upon for forfeiture.

The attorney general shall immediately examine the facts and applicable law of the cases referred to him or her pursuant to this section, and if it is probable that the property is subject to forfeiture shall immediately cause the initiation of administrative or judicial proceedings against the property. If, upon inquiry and examination, the attorney general determines that those proceedings probably cannot be sustained or that justice does not require the institution of the proceedings, he or she shall make a written report of those findings, transmit a copy to the seizing agency, and immediately authorize the release of the property.

If the value of any personal property seized does not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the attorney general may forfeit the property administratively in the following manner:

The attorney general shall provide notice of intention to forfeit property administratively by publication in a local newspaper of general circulation, one day per week for three (3) consecutive weeks.

In addition, to the extent practicable, the attorney general shall provide notice by registered mail of intent to forfeit the property administratively to all known interested parties and all parties whose identity is reasonably subject to discovery who may have an interest in the property seized.

Notice by publication and by mail shall include:

A description of the property;

The appraised value of the property;

The date and place of seizure;

The violation of law alleged against the subject property;

The instructions for filing claim and cost bond or a petition for remission or mitigation; and

A notice that the property will be forfeited to the state if a petition for remission or mitigation or a claim and cost bond has not been timely filed.

Persons claiming an interest in the property may file petitions for remission or mitigation of forfeiture or a claim and cost bond with the attorney general within thirty (30) days of the final notice by publication or receipt of written notice, whichever is earlier.

The attorney general shall inquire into the facts and circumstances surrounding petitions for remission or mitigation of forfeiture.

The attorney general shall provide the seizing agency and the petitioner a written decision on each petition for remission or mitigation within sixty (60) days of receipt of the petition unless the circumstances of the case require additional time, in which case the attorney general shall notify the petitioner in writing and with specificity within the sixty (60) day period that the circumstances of the case require additional time and further notify the petitioner of the expected decision date.

Any person claiming seized property under this subsection may institute de novo judicial review of the seizure and proposed forfeiture by timely filing with the attorney general a claim and bond to the state in the amount of ten percent (10%) of the appraised value of the property or in the penal sum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), whichever is greater, with sureties to be approved by the attorney general, upon condition that in the case of forfeiture the claimant shall pay all costs and expenses of the proceedings at the discretion of the court. Upon receipt of the claim and bond, or if he or she elects, the attorney general shall file with the court a complaint in rem in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section. Any funds received by the attorney general as cost bonds shall be placed in an escrow account pending final disposition of the case.

If no petitions or claims with bonds are timely filed, the attorney general shall prepare a written declaration of forfeiture of the subject property to the state and dispose of the property in accordance with this chapter.

If the petition is denied, the attorney general shall prepare a written declaration of forfeiture to the state and dispose of the property in accordance with this chapter and the attorney general’s regulations, if any, pursuant to this chapter.

A written declaration of forfeiture signed by the attorney general pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed to provide good and sufficient title to the forfeited property.

If the value of any personal property seized exceeds twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the attorney general shall file a complaint in rem against the property within twenty (20) days of the receipt of the report referred to in subsection (f) of this section and after this provide notice of intention to forfeit by publication in a local newspaper of general circulation for a period of at least once per week for three (3) consecutive weeks. The notice shall include:

A description of the property;

The appraised value of the property;

The date and place of seizure;

The violation of law alleged against the subject property.

The case may be tried by a jury, if in the superior court, upon the request of either party, otherwise by the court, and the cause of forfeiture alleged being proved, the court which shall try the case shall enter upon judgment for the forfeiture and disposition of the property according to law.

An appeal may be claimed by either party from any judgment of forfeiture rendered by the district court, to be taken in like manner as by defendants in criminal cases within the jurisdiction of the district court to try and determine, to the superior court for the same county in which the division of the district court rendering judgment is situated and like proceedings may be had therein as in cases of informations for forfeitures originally filed in that court.

The judgment of the superior court shall be final in all cases of the forfeitures, whether originally commenced in that court or brought there by appeal, unless a new trial is ordered, for cause shown by the supreme court.

The in rem action shall be brought in the district court if the value of the property seized is less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), otherwise the in rem action shall be brought in the superior court. The attorney general shall also, to the extent practicable, provide written notice of the action in rem to all known interested parties and all persons whose identity is reasonably subject to discovery who may have an interest in the property.

Persons claiming an interest in the property may file claims against the property within thirty (30) days of the final notice by publication or receipt of written notice, whichever is earlier. The claims shall be filed and adjudicated in the manner set forth for petitions in criminal proceedings in §

21-28-5.04.1(f)

.

If the property sought to be forfeited is real property, the attorney general shall file a complaint in rem in the superior court against the property. In addition to providing notice as required by this chapter, the attorney general shall file a lis pendens with respect to the property with the recorder of deeds in the city or town in which the property is located.

Upon order of the court forfeiting the subject property to the state, the state shall have clear title to the forfeited property, and the attorney general may transfer good and sufficient title to any subsequent purchaser or transferee. Title to the forfeited property shall be deemed to have vested in the state upon the commission of the act giving rise to the forfeiture under this chapter.

Upon entry of judgment for the claimant in any proceeding to forfeit property under this chapter, the property shall immediately be returned to the claimant. If it appears that there was reasonable cause for the seizure or the filing of the complaint, the court shall cause a proper certificate of that to be entered, and the claimant shall not, in that case, be entitled to costs or damages, nor shall the person or agency who made the seizure, nor the attorney general nor the prosecutor, be liable to suit or judgment on account of the seizure, suit, or prosecution.

In any action brought under this section, the state shall have the initial burden of showing the existence of probable cause for seizure or arrest of the property. Upon that showing by the state, the claimant shall have the burden of showing by a preponderance of evidence that the property was not subject to forfeiture under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 371, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 666, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 56.

21-28-5.05.
Forfeiture of controlled substances, related materials and other property, equipment and records.

The following shall be subject to forfeiture to the state and no property right shall exist in them:

All controlled substances manufactured, distributed, dispensed, or acquired in violation of this chapter.

All raw materials, products, and equipment of any kind used, or intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing, or exporting any controlled substance in violation of this chapter.

All property used, or intended for use, as a container for property described in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection, subject to the limitations of §

21-28-5.04

.

All books, records and research, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data used, or intended for use, in violation of this chapter.

All imitation controlled substances manufactured, distributed, or acquired in violation of this chapter.

Property taken or detained under this section shall not be repleviable, but shall be deemed to be in the custody of the law enforcement agency making the seizure. Whenever property is forfeited under this chapter the law enforcement agency may:

Retain the property for official use;

Sell any forfeited property which is not required by this chapter to be destroyed and which is not harmful to the public, but the proceeds of the sale, after first deducting an amount sufficient for all proper expenses of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising, and court costs, shall be paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 54.

21-28-5.06.
Seizure of contraband.

All controlled substances, which may be handled, sold, possessed, or distributed in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter shall be and are declared to be contraband; and shall be subject to seizure and confiscation by any state or local officer whose duty it is to enforce the laws of this state relating to controlled substances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-5.07.
Disposition of controlled substances.

Any person lawfully in possession of excess or undesired controlled substances shall dispose of the controlled substances in a manner established in regulation by the director which shall include, but not be limited to, requirements that the person shall keep a full and complete record of all controlled substances received and of all controlled substances disposed of, showing: (1) the exact kinds, quantities, and forms of the controlled substances; (2) the persons from whom received and to whom delivered; (3) by whose authority received, delivered, and destroyed; and (4) the date of the receipt, disposal or destruction, which record shall be open to inspection by all federal or state officers, including the director of health and the director’s delegated personnel, charged with the enforcement of federal law or of this chapter.

Controlled substances and imitation controlled substances seized by or in the possession of the Rhode Island state police shall be distributed or destroyed as provided by regulation. The superintendent of state police shall keep a full and complete record of all controlled substances received and of all controlled substances disposed of, showing: (1) the exact kinds, quantities, and forms of the controlled substances; (2) the persons from whom received and to whom delivered; (3) by whose authority received, delivered, and destroyed; and (4) the dates of the receipt, disposal, or destruction, which record shall be open to inspection by all federal or state officers charged with the enforcement of federal law or of this chapter.

Controlled substances and imitation controlled substances seized by or in the possession of any municipal or state law enforcement agency other than the Rhode Island state police shall be distributed or destroyed as provided by regulation. The chief law enforcement official of each agency shall keep a full and complete record of all controlled substances received and of all controlled substances disposed of, showing: (1) the exact kinds, quantities, and forms of the controlled substances; (2) the persons from whom received and to whom delivered; (3) by whose authority received, delivered, and destroyed; and (4) the dates of the receipt, disposal, or destruction, which record shall be open to inspection by all federal or state officers charged with the enforcement of federal law or of this chapter.

The director of health or his or her designee is authorized: (1) to enter any premises where controlled substances are brought for disposal pursuant to this section; (2) to inspect any and all aspects of the disposal process and related records; and (3) to obtain and test samples of any and all controlled substances being processed for disposal for the purpose of determining compliance with state and federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 28, § 5; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 54.